Utah statutes.
78A-6-1107.   Transfer of continuing jurisdiction to other district.
Jurisdiction over a minor on probation or under protective supervision, or of
a minor who is otherwise under the continuing jurisdiction of the court, may
be transferred by the court to the court of another district, if the receiving
court consents, or upon direction of the chair of the Board of Juvenile Court
Judges.  The receiving court has the same powers with respect to the minor
that it would have if the proceedings originated in that court.
